fr: Style de clavier: Alphanumeric; Biométrique; Numérique; Mécanique; Numérique; Tactile; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de teclado: Alfanumérico; Biométrico; Digital; Mecânico; Numérico; Sensível ao toque; Outro
cs: Styl numerické klávesnice: Alfanumerická; Biometrická; Digitální; Mechanický; Numerická; Citlivá na dotek; Jiné
pl: Styl klawiatury: Alfanumeryczny; Biometria; Cyfrowe; Mechaniczne; Numeryczne; Ekran dotykowy; Inne
es: Estilo de teclado: Alfanumérico; Biométrico; Digital; Mecánico; Numérico; Táctil; Otros
th: สไตล์ปุ่มกด: แบบตัวอักษรและตัวเลข; แบบไบโอเมตริก; ดิจิทัล; แบบกลไก; แบบตัวเลข; แบบปุ่มสัมผัส; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Mygtukų tipas: Raidžių ir skaičių; Biometrinė; Skaitmeninė; Mechaninė; Skaičių; Lietimui jautri; Kita
ro-RO: Stil tastatură: Alfanumerică; Biometrică; Digitală; Mecanică; Numerică; Sensibilă la atingere; Altele
pt-BR: Estilo do teclado: Alfanumérico; Biométrico; Digital; Mecânica; Numérico; Sensível ao toque; Outro
hr-HR: Stil tipkovnice: Alfanumerička; Biometrijska; Digitalna; Mehanička; Numerička; Osjetljiva na dodir; Ostalo
ja: キーパッドのスタイル: 英数字; 生体認証; デジタル; メカニカル; 数字式; タッチセンサー式; その他
sv: Knappsatsstil: Alfanumerisk; Biometric; Digital; Mekaniskt; Numeriskt; Tryckkänsligt; Övrigt
ru: Тип кнопочной панели: Буквенно-цифровая; Биометрическая; Цифровая; Механическая; Числовая; Сенсорная; Другая
sk-SK: Štýl klávesnice: Alfanumerický; Biometrický; Digitálny; Mechanický; Numerický; Citlivý na dotyk; Iné
zh-CN: 小键盘款式: 字母数字; 生物识别; 数字化; 机械; 数字; 触摸敏感式; 其他
de: Tastaturstil: Alphanumerisch; Biometrisch; Digital; Mechanisch; Numerisch; Berührungsempfindlich; Sonstiges
el: Στυλ πληκτρολογίου: Αλφαριθμητικό; Βιομετρική; Ψηφιακός; Μηχανικό; Αριθμητικό; Ευαίσθητο στην αφή; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu bộ phím: Chữ và số; Sinh trắc học; Kỹ thuật số; Cơ; Số; Cảm ứng nhạy; Khác
zh-TW: 鍵盤樣式: 字母數字; 生物識別; 數位; 機械; 數字; 紫外線敏感; 其他
tr: Tuş Takımı Stili: Alfasayısal; Biyometrik; Dijital; Mekanik; Sayısal; Dokunmaya duyarlı; Diğer
ko: 키패드 스타일: 영숫자; 생체인식; 디지털; 기계식; 숫자; 터치 감지; 기타
nb: Tastaturstil: Alfanumerisk; Biometrisk; Digital; Mekanisk; Numerisk; Berøringsfølsom; Annet
bg-BG: Стил на цифровата клавиатура: Буквено-цифрова; Биометрични данни; Цифрова; Механична; Числена; Чувствителна на допир; Други
da: Keypad-stil: Alfanumerisk; Biometrisk; Digital; Mekanisk; Numerisk; Berøringsfølsom; Andet
en: Keypad style: Alphanumeric; Biometric; Digital; Mechanical; Numeric; Touch-sensitive; Other
nl: Keypadstijl: Alfanumeriek; Biometrisch; Digitaal; Mechanisch; Numeriek; Aanraakgevoelig; Andere
it: Stile della tastiera: Alfanumerico; Biometrico; Digital; Meccanico; Numerico; Sensibile al tocco; Altro
hu: Billentyűzet stílusa: Alfanumerikus; Biometrikus; Digitális; Mechanikus; Numerikus; Érintésérzékeny; Egyéb
sl-SI: Način tipkovnice: Alfanumeričen; Biometrična; Digitalno; Mehansko; Numeričen; Občutljivo na dotik; Drugo
fi: Numerosormion tyyli: Aakkosnumeerinen; Biometrinen; Digitaalinen; Mekaaninen; Numeerinen; Kosketusherkkä; Muu